Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,117
Record retention requirements.

The title insurance agent shall maintain sufficient records of its affairs, including its escrow operations and escrow trust accounts, so that the director may adequately ensure that the title insurance agent is in compliance with all provisions of the Title Insurance Agent Act. The director may prescribe the specific record entries and documents to be kept and the length of time for which the records must be maintained.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 40.